Tennessee statutes. Title 59 Mines And Mining
Chapter 13

Coal Cooperative Marketing Associations

59-13-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Coal Cooperative Marketing Association Law of 1984.”

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 1.

59-13-102. Legislative intent.

In order to promote, foster and encourage the intelligent and orderly marketing of Tennessee coal through cooperation; and to eliminate speculation and waste; and to make the distribution of coal between producer and consumer as direct as can be efficiently done; and to stabilize the marketing of coal and coal products; and to provide for the organization and incorporation of cooperative marketing associations for the marketing of such products, this chapter is enacted.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 2.

59-13-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions shall have the meanings set out unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Association” means any corporation organized under this chapter. Associations organized hereunder shall be deemed “nonprofit,” inasmuch as they are not organized to make profit for themselves, as such, or for their members, as such, but only for their members as producers;

“Coal” means coal and all of its derivatives;

“Member” means actual members of associations without capital stock, and holders of common stock in associations organized with capital stock; and

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, and association.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 3.

59-13-104. Creation of associations.

Seven (7) or more persons, a majority of whom are residents of this state, engaged in the production of coal, may form a nonprofit, cooperative association, with or without capital stock, under this chapter.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 4.

59-13-105. Purposes.

An association may be organized to engage in any activity in connection with the marketing or selling of the coal of its members or with the sampling, storing, processing, permitting, reclamation, or transporting of the coal or its derivatives; or in connection with the manufacturing, selling, or supplying to its members of machinery, equipment, or supplies; or in the financing of the above enumerated activities; or in any one (1) or more of the activities specified in this chapter.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 5.

59-13-106. Communications regarding probable success.

Every group of persons contemplating the organization of an association under this chapter is urged to communicate with the department of environment and conservation, office of energy programs, which will inform them, among other things, of the probable success of the association regardless of whatever the survey of the marketing conditions affecting the commodities proposed to be handled may indicate.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 6; 2016, ch. 743, § 16.

59-13-107. Powers and duties.

Each association incorporated under this chapter shall have the following powers, to:

Engage in activity in connection with the marketing or selling of the coal of its members or the sampling, storing, processing, permitting, reclamation, transporting of the coal or marketing of the derivatives thereof; or in any activity in connection with the purchase, hiring, or use by its members of supplies, machinery, or equipment; or in the financing of any such activities; or in any one (1) or more of the activities specified in this section; and such association may also buy, sell and deal in coal of nonmembers to any amount not greater in value than such as is handled by it for its members;

Borrow money and to make advance payments and advances to members;

Act as the agent or representative of any member or members in any of the above-mentioned activities;

Purchase or otherwise acquire, and to hold, own, and exercise all rights or ownership in, and to sell, transfer, or pledge, or guarantee the payment of dividends or interest on or the retirement or redemption of, shares of the capital stock or bonds of any corporation or association engaged in any related activity or in the storing or handling or marketing of any of the products handled by the association;

Establish reserves and to invest the funds thereof in bonds or in such other property as may be provided in the bylaws;

Buy, hold, and exercise all privileges or ownership over such real or personal property as may be necessary or convenient or incidental for the conduct and operation of any business of the association, or incidental thereto;

Establish, secure, own and develop patents, trademarks and copyrights; and

Do each and every thing necessary, suitable or proper for the accomplishment of any one (1) of the purposes or the attainment of any one (1) or more of the subjects enumerated; or conducive to or expedient for the interest or benefit of the association; and to contract accordingly; and in addition to exercise and possess all powers, rights and privileges necessary or incidental to the purposes for which the association is organized or to the activities in which it is engaged; and in addition, any other rights, powers, and privileges granted by the laws of this state to ordinary corporations, except such as are inconsistent with the express provisions of this chapter, and to do any such thing anywhere.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 7.

59-13-108. Membership — Stock.

Under the terms and conditions prescribed in the bylaws adopted by it, an association may admit as members (or issue common stock to) only persons engaged in the production of coal or its derivatives to be handled by or through the association.

If a member of a nonstock association be other than a natural person, such members may be represented by any individual, associate, officer, or manager, or member of such association duly authorized in writing.

One (1) association organized hereunder may become a member or stockholder of any other association or associations organized hereunder.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 8.

59-13-109. Articles of incorporation — Directors — Stock.

Each association formed under this chapter must prepare and file articles of incorporation, setting forth:

The name of the association;

The purpose for which it is formed;

The place where its principal business will be transacted;

The duration of the association, if other than perpetual. If the charter of any association organized under this chapter provides for a term of existence, not exceeding fifty (50) years, such charter is hereby deemed to be amended to provide that the duration of the association is perpetual, unless a majority of the members of such association shall vote to limit the duration of the association to some other period of time in accordance with title 48, chapter 11, part 3 or title 48, chapter 51, part 3, as applicable; provided, however, that in no event may the members so amend the charter of an association which has been in existence for more than fifty (50) years;

The number of directors of the association, which must be not less than three (3) and may be any number greater than the required minimum; the term of office of such directors; and the names and addresses of those who are to serve as incorporating directors for the first term, or until the election and qualification of their successors;

If organized without capital stock, whether the property rights and interest of each member shall be equal or unequal, and if unequal, the general rule or rules applicable to all members by which the property rights and interests, respectively, of each member may and shall be determined and fixed; and provision for the admission of new members who shall be entitled to share in the property of the association with the old members, in accordance with such general rule or rules. This provision or paragraph of the articles of incorporation shall not be altered, amended, or repealed, except by the written consent or vote of three fourths (¾) of the members; and

If organized with capital stock, the amount of such stock and the number of shares into which it is divided and the par value of such stock.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 9.

Cross-References. Preferred stock, §59-13-126.

59-13-110. Stock — Common and preferred.

The capital stock may be divided into preferred and common stock. If so divided, the articles of incorporation must contain a statement of the number of shares of stock to which preference is granted and the number of shares of stock to which no preference is granted; and the nature and definite extent of the preference and privileges granted to each.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 10.

Cross-References. Conditions for issuing stock, §59-13-123.

Preferred stock, §59-13-126.

Purchase of common stock by association, §59-13-128.

Use of preferred stock to discharge obligations, §59-13-133.

59-13-111. Articles of incorporation — Subscription and acknowledgment — Copies — Evidence.

The articles must be subscribed by the incorporators and acknowledged; and when filed, such articles of incorporation or certified copies of such articles shall be received in all the courts of this state and other places as prima facie evidence of the due incorporation of such association.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 11.

59-13-112. Amendment of articles.

An amendment must first be approved by two thirds (2/3) of the directors and then adopted by a vote representing a majority of all the members of the association.

However, if at a meeting of the members of the association to which a proposed amendment has been submitted, a majority of the members are not present, then those present and also members voting by proxy may adjourn the meeting to a time and place certain, but not sooner than three (3) weeks from the time of adjournment. Prior to the convening of the adjourned meeting, notices shall be placed in a newspaper of general circulation in the place where the principal office of the association is located each week for three (3) weeks. Such notices shall state the time, place, and purpose of the adjourned meeting. When the meeting reconvenes, the members present in person or by proxy shall constitute the quorum, and may take action on the proposed amendment by a majority vote of those represented, even if fewer than a majority of the total membership of the association.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 12.

59-13-113. Bylaws.

Each association incorporated under this chapter must, within thirty (30) days after its incorporation, adopt for its government and management, a code of bylaws, not inconsistent with the powers granted by this chapter. A majority vote of the members or stockholders, or their written assent, is necessary to adopt such bylaws. Each association, under its bylaws, may provide for any or all of the following matters:

The number of stockholders or members constituting a quorum;

The right of members or stockholders to vote by proxy or by mail or both; and the conditions, manner, form, and effects of such votes;

The number of directors constituting a quorum;

The qualifications, compensation and duties and term of office of directors and officers; time of their election and the mode and manner of giving notice thereof;

Penalties for violations of the bylaws;

The amount of entrance, organization, and membership fees, if any; the manner and method of collection of the same; and the purposes for which they may be used;

The amount which each member or stockholder shall be required to pay annually or from time to time, if at all, to carry on the business of the association; the charge, if any, to be paid by each member or stockholder for services rendered by the association to the member or stockholder and the time of payment and the manner of collection; and the marketing contract between the association and its members or stockholders which every member or stockholder may be required to sign; and

The number and qualification of members or stockholders of the association and the conditions precedent to membership or ownership of common stock; the method, time, and manner of permitting members to withdraw or the holders of common stock to transfer their stock; the manner of assignment and transfer of the interest of members and of the shares of common stock; the conditions upon which and the time when membership of any member shall cease; the automatic suspension of the rights of a member when the member ceases to be eligible to membership in the association; and the mode, manner, and effect of the expulsion of a member; the manner of determining the value of a member's interest and provision for its purchase by the association upon the death or withdrawal of a member or stockholder, or upon the expulsion of a member or forfeiture of membership, or, at the option of the association, the purchase at a price fixed by conclusive appraisal by the board of directors. In case of the withdrawal or expulsion of a member, the board of directors shall equitably and conclusively appraise the member's property interests in the association and shall fix the amount thereof in money, which shall be paid to the member within one (1) year after such expulsion or withdrawal.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 13.

59-13-114. Meetings.

In its bylaws, each association shall provide for one (1) or more regular meetings annually. The board of directors shall have the right to call a special meeting at any time; and ten percent (10%) of the members or stockholders may file a petition stating the specific business to be brought before the association and demand a special meeting at any time, and if such a special meeting is appropriately demanded, then such a meeting must be called by the directors. Notice of all meetings, together with a statement of the purposes thereof, shall be mailed to each member at least ten (10) days prior to the meeting; provided, however, that the bylaws may require instead that such notice may be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation, published at the principal place of business of the association.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 14.

59-13-115. Board of directors.

The affairs of the association shall be managed by a board of not fewer than three (3) directors, elected by the members or stockholders not from their own number. The bylaws may provide that one (1) or more directors may be appointed by any public official or commission or by the other directors selected by the members or their delegates. The directors so appointed cannot be members or stockholders of the association.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 15.

59-13-116. Compensation of officers and directors.

An association may provide a fair remuneration for the time actually spent by its officers and directors in its service and for the service of the members of its executive committee.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 16.

59-13-117. Contracts and positions of directors — Prohibitions.

No director, during the term of the director's office, shall be a party to a contract for profit with the association differing in any way from the business relations accorded regular members or holders of common stock of the association or others, or differing from terms generally current in that district. The bylaws may provide that no director shall occupy any position in the association, except the president and secretary on regular salary or substantially full-time pay.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 17.

59-13-118. Executive committee.

The bylaws may provide for an executive committee and may allot to such committee all the functions and powers of the board of directors, subject to the general direction and control of the board.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 18.

59-13-119. Vacancies on board.

When a vacancy on the board of directors occurs, a majority vote of the executive committee shall fill the vacancy. A director elected to fill a vacancy shall be elected for the predecessor's unexpired term in office. Any directorship to be filled by reason of an increase in the number of directors may be filled for such reason by such board of directors for a term of office continuing only until the next regular election of directors.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 19.

59-13-120. Election of officers.

The directors shall elect from their number a president and may elect one (1) or more vice presidents. They shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer; and they may combine the two (2) latter offices and designate the combined office as secretary-treasurer; or unite both functions and titles in one (1) person. The treasurer may be a bank or any depository, and as such, shall not be considered as an officer, but as a function of the board of directors. In such case, the secretary shall perform the usual accounting duties of the treasurer, excepting that the funds shall be deposited only as and where authorized by the board of directors.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 20.

59-13-121. Surety bonds.

Every officer, employee, and agent handling funds or negotiable instruments or property of or for any association created hereunder shall be required to execute and deliver adequate bond for the faithful performance of duties and obligations.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 21.

59-13-122. Certificates of membership.

When a member of an association established without capital stock has paid the membership fee in full, the member shall receive a certificate of membership.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 22.

59-13-123. Conditions of issuing stock.

No association shall issue stock to a member until it has been fully paid for. The promissory notes of the members may be accepted by the association as full or partial payment. The association shall hold the stock as security for the payment of the note, but such retention as security shall not affect the member's right to vote.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 23.

Cross-References. Purchase of common stock by association, §59-13-128.

59-13-124. Liability of members.

No member shall be liable for the debts of the association to an amount exceeding the sum remaining unpaid on the membership fee or the subscription to the capital stock, including any unpaid balance on any promissory notes given in payment thereof.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 24.

59-13-125. Number of votes of members or stockholders.

No member or stockholder shall be entitled to more than one (1) vote, regardless of the number of shares of common stock owned by the member or stockholder.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 25.

59-13-126. Preferred stock.

Any association organized with stock under this chapter may issue preferred stock, with or without the right to vote. Such stock may be sold to any person, member or nonmember, and may be redeemable or retireable by the association on such terms and conditions as may be provided for by the articles of incorporation and printed on the face of the certificate.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 26.

Cross-References. Division of capital stock into preferred and common stock, §59-13-110.

59-13-127. Prohibited transfer of common stock.

The bylaws shall prohibit the transfer of the common stock of the association to persons not engaged in the production of coal or coal products handled by the association; and such restrictions must be printed upon every certificate of stock subject thereof.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 27.

59-13-128. Purchase of common stock by association.

The association may, at any time, as specified in the bylaws, except when the debts of the association exceed fifty percent (50%) of the association's assets, buy in or purchase its common stock at book value, as conclusively determined by the board of directors, and pay for it in cash within one (1) year thereafter.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 28.

Cross-References. Conditions for issuing stock, §59-13-123.

59-13-129. Removal of officers or directors.

Any member may bring charges against an officer or director by filing them in writing with the secretary of the association, together with a petition signed by a majority of the members, requesting the removal of the officer or director in question. The removal shall be voted upon at the next regular or special meeting of the association and, by a vote of two thirds (2/3) of the members, the association may remove the officer or director. The director or officer, against whom such charges have been brought, shall be informed in writing of the charges previous to the meeting and shall have an opportunity at the meeting to be heard in person or by counsel and to present witnesses; and the person or persons bringing the charges against the director or officer shall have the same opportunity.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 29.

59-13-130. Referral of policy to membership.

Upon demand of two thirds (2/3) of the entire board of directors, made immediately and so recorded at the same meeting at which the original motion was passed, any matter of policy that has been approved or passed by the board must be referred to the entire membership or the stockholders for decision at the next special or regular meeting; and a special meeting may be called for the purpose.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 30.

59-13-131. Marketing contracts — Sales to or through associations.

The association through its board of directors may bid for and execute marketing contracts subject to a majority vote of its members requiring the members to sell, for any period of time, not over ten (10) years, all or any specified part of their coal exclusively to or through the association, or any facilities to be created by the association. If they contract a sale to the association, it shall be conclusively held that title to the products passes absolutely and unreservedly, except for recorded and statutory liens, to the association upon delivery. The contract may provide, among other things, that the association may sell or resell the products delivered by its members, with or without taking title to such product; and pay over to its members the resale price, after deducting all necessary selling, overhead, and other costs and expenses, including interest or dividends on stock, not exceeding eight percent (8%) per annum, and reserves for retiring the stock, if any; and other proper reserves; and/or any other deductions.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 31.

59-13-132. Breach of contract — Payment of damages and costs — Injunctions.

The bylaws or the marketing contract may fix, as liquidated damages, specific sums to be paid by the members or stockholders to the association upon the breach by such members or stockholders of any provision of the marketing contract regarding the sale or delivery or withholding of products; and may further provide that such members or stockholders will pay all costs, premiums for bonds, expenses, and fees, in case any action is brought upon the contract by the association; and any such provisions shall be valid and enforceable in the courts of this state; and such clauses providing for liquidated damages shall be enforceable as such and shall not be regarded as penalties.

In the event of any such breach or threatened breach of such marketing contract by a member or stockholder, the association shall be entitled to an injunction to prevent the further breach of the contract and to a decree of specific performance. Pending the adjudication of such an action and upon filing a verified complaint showing the breach or threatened breach, and upon filing a sufficient bond, the association shall be entitled to a temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction against the member or stockholder.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 32.

59-13-133. Use of preferred stock to discharge obligations.

Whenever an association, organized pursuant to this chapter with preferred capital stock, shall purchase the stock or any property, or any interest in any property of any person, it may discharge the obligations so incurred, wholly or in part, by exchanging for the acquired interest, shares of its preferred capital stock to an amount which at par value would equal the fair market value of the stock or interest so purchased, as determined by the board of directors. In that case the transfer to the association of the stock or interest purchased shall be equivalent to payment in cash for the shares of stock issued.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 33.

59-13-134. Reports.

Each association formed under this chapter shall prepare an annual report on forms to be furnished by the secretary of state, containing the name of the association, its principal place of business, a general statement of its business operations during the fiscal year, showing the amount of capital stock paid up and the number of stockholders if a stock association or the number of members and the amount of membership fees received, if a nonstock association, the total expenses of operations, the amount of its indebtedness or liabilities, and its balance sheets.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 34.

59-13-135. Interests in other corporations.

An association may organize, form, operate, own, control, have an interest in, own stock of, or be a member of any other corporation or corporations with or without capital stock, and engaged in sampling, storing, processing, permitting, reclamation, transporting, marketing, or selling of the coal or the derivatives thereof handled by the association.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 37.

59-13-136. Interests in warehousing corporations.

If such corporations are warehousing corporations, they may issue legal warehouse receipts to the association against the commodities delivered by it, or to any other person and such legal warehouse receipts shall be considered as adequate collateral to the extent of the usual and current value of the commodity represented. In case such warehouse is licensed or licensed and bonded under the laws of this or any other state or the United States, its warehouse receipt delivered to the association on commodities of the association or its members, or delivered by the association or its members, shall not be challenged or discriminated against because of ownership or control, wholly or in part, by the association.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 38.

59-13-137. Permissible contracts and agreements.

Any association may, upon resolution adopted by its board of directors, enter into all necessary and proper contracts and agreements, and make all necessary and proper stipulations, agreements, and contracts and arrangements with any other cooperative corporation, association, or associations, formed in this or in any other state, for the cooperative and more economical carrying on of its business or any part or parts thereof. Any two (2) or more associations may, by agreement between them, unite in employing and using or may separately employ and use the same personnel, methods, means and agencies for carrying on and conducting their respective businesses.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 39.

59-13-138. Out-of-state corporations.

Any corporation or association organized under generally similar laws of another state shall be allowed to carry on any proper activities, operations or functions in this state upon compliance with the general regulations applicable to foreign corporations desiring to do business in this state, and the payment into the office of the secretary of state the same fees that are required to be paid under title 48, chapter 11 and by paying all other taxes which other foreign corporations are required to pay in Tennessee, and all contracts, which could be made by any association incorporated pursuant to this chapter made by or with such association, shall be legal and valid and enforceable in this state with all of the remedies set forth in this chapter.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 40.

59-13-139. Restraint of trade — Monopolies.

No association organized pursuant to this chapter and complying with the terms of such chapter shall be deemed to be a conspiracy or a combination in restraint of trade or an illegal monopoly; or an attempt to lessen competition or to fix prices arbitrarily, nor shall the marketing contracts and agreements between the association and its members or any agreements authorized in this chapter be considered illegal as such or in unlawful restraint of trade or as part of a conspiracy or combination to accomplish an improper or illegal purpose.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 41.

59-13-140. Fees — Liability for privilege tax.

Each association, organized pursuant to this chapter, shall pay an annual fee of ten dollars ($10.00) only, in lieu of all franchise or license or corporation or other privilege taxes or taxes or charges upon reserves held by it for members; provided, however, that if any association organized pursuant to this chapter sells to persons other than its own members any product or merchandise other than coal or its derivative products, such association shall be liable for any privilege tax with respect to such transactions or method of doing business imposed under the laws of Tennessee, other than franchise and excise taxes and corporation filing fees or charges upon reserves held by it for members.

For filing articles of incorporation, an association organized pursuant to this chapter shall pay ten dollars ($10.00); and for filing an amendment to the articles, two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50).

Acts 1984, ch. 864, §§ 43, 44.

59-13-141. Combinations — Amendment of preexisting charters.

Corporations not for profit, of this class, heretofore organized under the general incorporation laws, or laws later enacted, are empowered to combine into associations upon such terms as may be provided and agreed upon, or by one becoming a member of the other. Further, preexisting charters of such corporations are hereby amended, under the power reserved to the general assembly, so as to bring such corporations into conformity with this chapter, thus granting such corporations the powers and imposing upon them the duties and liabilities set forth in this chapter.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 45.

Cross-References. Corporations generally, title 48.

Corporations not for profit, title 48, chs. 51-69.

59-13-142. Exemption for subsidiaries.

All corporations organized as subsidiaries and controlled by any coal cooperative association formed in accordance with the laws of this state shall not be considered corporations organized for profit and doing business in Tennessee, or subject to any privilege tax levied by any law as a tax for the privilege of doing business for profit in Tennessee, it being the legislative intent to exempt by this section all such subsidiary corporations controlled by coal cooperative associations, where any and all profits earned by such subsidiary corporations are paid over to or expended for the benefit of such coal cooperative associations, with the result that the activities carried on by such corporations eventually promote and benefit the coal interest of this state.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 46.

59-13-143. Applicability of existing exemptions.

Any exemptions whatsoever under all existing laws applying to coal or its derivatives in the possession or under the control of the individual producer shall apply similarly and completely to such products delivered by its former members, in the possession or under the control of the association.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, § 36.

59-13-144. Applicability of corporation laws — Conflicting laws.

The general corporation laws and all powers and rights under such laws shall apply to the associations organized pursuant to such laws, except where such provisions are in conflict or inconsistent with the express provisions of this chapter.

Any law which is in conflict with this chapter shall be construed as not applying to the associations herein provided for.

Acts 1984, ch. 864, §§ 35, 42.

Cross-References. Corporations generally, title 48.